Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.226

Right to distribution.

Subject to RCW 25.15.231 and 25.15.305, at the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, that member has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of a limited liability company with respect to the distribution. A limited liability company agreement may provide for the establishment of a record date with respect to allocations and distributions by a limited liability company. The limited liability company's obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount due and payable to the limited liability company by the person on whose account the distribution is made.

[ 2015 c 188 s 45.]